Hawaii statutes.
§514E-5 Geographic limitations. Except
as provided in this section, time share units, time share plans, and transient
vacation rentals are prohibited.

(1) Existing time share units, time share plans, and
transient vacation rentals are not impaired by the provisions of this section.

(2) Time share units, time share plans, and transient
vacation rentals are allowed:

(A) In areas designated for hotel use, resort
use, or transient vacation rentals, pursuant to county authority under section
46-4, or where the county, by its legislative process, designates hotel,
transient vacation rental, or resort use;

(B) In a hotel where the county explicitly
approves such use, in advance, as a nonconforming use; or

(C) In a county with a population in excess
of five hundred thousand, in an existing hotel which is a valid nonconforming
use under county ordinance. [L 1980, c 186, pt of §1; am L 1982, c 191, §1; am
L 2002, c 204, §7; am L 2009, c 12, §1]

Attorney General Opinions

Declaration calling for future "annexation" of
units within a project or building is not sufficient to establish those units
as "pre-existing". Att. Gen. Op. 81-14.

Geographic limitations of section apply to certain
registration filings made prior to effective date of limitations. Att. Gen.
Op. 83-1.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next